Virginia statutes. Title 27. Fire Protection.
Chapter 7. Liquefied Petroleum Gases.

§§ 27-86 through 27-90.

Repealed by Acts 1995, c. 44.

Editor’s note.

Former §§

27-86

through 27-90, which defined liquefied petroleum gas, authorized promulgation of regulations regarding use, installation, etc. of liquefied petroleum gas, and provided penalties, were derived from Acts 1950, pp. 152. 153; 1964, c. 41; 1980, c. 670.